algorithms/finnish.sbl
/* Finnish stemmer.

   Numbers in square brackets refer to the sections in
   Fred Karlsson, Finnish: An Essential Grammar. Routledge, 1999
   ISBN 0-415-20705-3

*/

routines (
           mark_regions
           R2
           particle_etc possessive
           LONG VI A E I O U A_ O_
           case_ending
           i_plural
           t_plural
           other_endings
           tidy
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( p1 p2 )
strings ( x )
booleans ( ending_removed )
groupings ( AEI C V1 particle_end )

stringescapes {}

/* special characters */

stringdef a"   '{U+00E4}'
stringdef o"   '{U+00F6}'
stringdef o/   '{U+00F8}'

define AEI 'a{a"}ei'
define C 'bcdfghjklmnpqrstvwxz'
define V1 'aeiouy{a"}{o"}'
define particle_end V1 + 'nt'

define mark_regions as (

    $p1 = limit
    $p2 = limit

    gopast V1  gopast non-V1  setmark p1
    gopast V1  gopast non-V1  setmark p2
)

backwardmode (

    define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

    define particle_etc as (
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        among(
            'kin'
            'kaan' 'k{a"}{a"}n'
            'ko'   'k{o"}'
            'han'  'h{a"}n'
            'pa'   'p{a"}'    // Particles [91]
                (particle_end)
            'sti'             // Adverb [87]
                (R2)
        )
        delete
    )
    define possessive as (    // [36]
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        among(
            'si'
                (not 'k' delete)  // take 'ksi' as the Comitative case
            'ni'
                (delete ['kse'] <- 'ksi') // kseni = ksi + ni
            'nsa' 'ns{a"}'
            'mme'
            'nne'
                (delete)
            /* Now for Vn possessives after case endings: [36] */
            'an'
                (among('ta' 'ssa' 'sta' 'lla' 'lta' 'na') delete)
            '{a"}n'
                (among('t{a"}' 'ss{a"}' 'st{a"}'
                       'll{a"}' 'lt{a"}' 'n{a"}') delete)
            'en'
                (among('lle' 'ine') delete)
        )
    )

    define LONG as
        among('aa' 'ee' 'ii' 'oo' 'uu' '{a"}{a"}' '{o"}{o"}')

    define VI as
        among('ai' 'ei' 'ii' 'oi' 'ui' '{a"}i' '{o"}i' '{'}')

    define A as ('a' or '{'}')
    define E as ('e' or '{'}')
    define I as ('i' or '{'}')
    define O as ('o' or '{'}')
    define U as ('u' or '{'}')
    define A_ as ('{a"}' or '{'}')
    // -ø-hön seen with Norwegian place names, e.g. Bodøhön
    define O_ as ('{o"}' or '{o/}' or '{'}')

    define case_ending as (
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        among(
            'h{a"}n' A_             //-.
            'h{o"}n' O_             // |
            'han'    A              // |
            'hen'    E              // |
            'hin'    I              // Illative   [43]
            'hon'    O              // |
            'hun'    U              // |
            'siin'   VI             // |
            'seen'   LONG           //-'

            'den'    VI
            'tten'   VI             // Genitive plurals [34]
                     ()
            'n'                     // Genitive or Illative
                ( try ( LONG // Illative
                        or 'ie' // Genitive
                          and next ]
                      )
                  /* otherwise Genitive */
                )

            'a' '{a"}'              //-.
                     (V1 C)         // |
            'tta' 'tt{a"}'          // Partitive  [32]
                     ('e')          // |
            'ta' 't{a"}'            //-'

            'ssa' 'ss{a"}'          // Inessive   [41]
            'sta' 'st{a"}'          // Elative    [42]

            'lla' 'll{a"}'          // Adessive   [44]
            'lta' 'lt{a"}'          // Ablative   [51]
            'lle'                   // Allative   [46]
            'na' 'n{a"}'            // Essive     [49]
            'ksi'                   // Translative[50]
            'ine'                   // Comitative [51]

            /* Abessive and Instructive are too rare for
               inclusion [51] */

        )
        delete
        set ending_removed
    )
    define other_endings as (
        setlimit tomark p2 for ([substring])
        among(
            'mpi' 'mpa' 'mp{a"}'
            'mmi' 'mma' 'mm{a"}'    // Comparative forms [85]
                (not 'po')          //-improves things
            'impi' 'impa' 'imp{a"}'
            'immi' 'imma' 'imm{a"}' // Superlative forms [86]
            'eja' 'ej{a"}'          // indicates agent [93.1B]
        )
        delete
    )
    define i_plural as (            // [26]
        setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring])
        among(
            'i'  'j'
        )
        delete
    )
    define t_plural as (            // [26]
        setlimit tomark p1 for (
            ['t'] test V1
            delete
        )
        setlimit tomark p2 for ([substring])
        among(
            'mma' (not 'po') //-mmat endings
            'imma'           //-immat endings
        )
        delete
    )
    define tidy as (
        setlimit tomark p1 for (
            do ( LONG and ([next] delete ) ) // undouble vowel
            do ( [AEI] C delete ) // remove trailing a, a", e, i
            do ( ['j'] 'o' or 'u' delete )
            do ( ['o'] 'j' delete )
        )
        do (goto non-V1 [C] -> x  x delete) // undouble consonant
        ['{'}'] delete
    )
)

define stem as (

    do mark_regions
    unset ending_removed
    backwards (
        do particle_etc
        do possessive
        do case_ending
        do other_endings
        (ending_removed do i_plural) or do t_plural
        do tidy
    )
)
